errortag-src/twol-sme.txt
! *) footnote 1
! Older, removed versions:
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ StemCns:* : ;
! This one gave vuovden# as only possible form of vuovdin in compounds.
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
! the problem with this one was that it was not restricted to compounds !!
! The X7: | X8: line was commented out since no lexicon in sme-lex.txt
! pointed from X8 to R. This move should be checked for compounds later.

!"Vowel Shortening in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 2"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] Vz Cns+ Cns: Cns+ _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!			where Vz in (a i o u) ;
!			where Vx in (u i)
!			      Vy in (o e)
!			matched ;
! XXX Remainder! This rule is commented out since including it
! spoils the i:á alternation of verbs (boahtit:boađán, for some reason.
! This should be looked into.
